Missouri, session 2026, HB1967.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 21, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 21.489, to read as follows:
21.489. 1. The sponsor of a bill shall remain present in the hearing room for the
entirety of the public hearing on such bill.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, the bill sponsor
may leave the hearing room to attend to health or personal needs and shall return to the
hearing room within ten minutes.
3. As used in this section, the term "health or personal needs" shall include
essential activities required to maintain an individual's physical well-being and shall not
include breaks for meals or meetings.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.